Washington statutes.
RCW 36.78.050

Meetings—Rules and regulations—Election of chair.

The board shall meet at least once quarterly and shall from time to time adopt rules and regulations for its own government and as may be necessary for it to discharge its duties and exercise its powers under this chapter. The board shall elect a chair from its own membership who shall hold office for one year. Election as chair does not affect the member's right to vote on all matters before the board.

[ 1993 c 65 s 2; 1965 ex.s. c 120 s 5.]